Maryland, session 2025, HB0844.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
2–333.
(b) (1) The Sheriff of Somerset County shall receive an annual salary of not
less than [$85,000] $105,000.
Article 20 – Somerset County
2–101.
– 1 –

Ch. 400 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) There are 5 County Commissioners for Somerset County, who hold office for 4
years and until their successors are elected and qualified.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, each
Commissioner shall receive an annual salary of [$10,000] $12,000.
(2) The President of the County Commissioners shall receive an annual
salary of [$11,000] $13,000.
9–104.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the members of
the County Roads Board shall each receive, in addition to their compensation as County
Commissioners, a salary of [$10,000] $12,000 annually as a member of the County Roads
Board.
(2) The President of the County Roads Board shall receive, in addition to
compensation received as President of the County Commissioners, an annual salary of
[$11,000] $13,000.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, in accordance with Article
III, § 35 of the Maryland Constitution, this Act may not be construed to extend or apply to
the salary or compensation of the Sheriff of Somerset County, the County Commissioners
of Somerset County, the President of the County Commissioners of Somerset County, a
member of the County Roads Board of Somerset County, or the President of the County
Roads Board of Somerset County while serving in a term of office beginning before the
effective date of this Act, but the provisions of this Act concerning the salary or
compensation of the Sheriff of Somerset County, the County Commissioners of Somerset
County, the President of the County Commissioners of Somerset County, a member of the
County Roads Board of Somerset County, and the President of the County Roads Board of
Somerset County shall take effect at the beginning of the next following term of office. This
limitation does not apply to an individual appointed or elected after the effective date of
this Act to fill out an unexpired term.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 2 –